Maryland, session 2025, SB0720.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
19–386. RESERVED.
19–387. RESERVED.
PART XII. CLINICAL STAFFING COMMITTEES AND PLANS.
19–388.
(A) (1) IN THIS PART THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0720*

SENATE BILL 720
(2) (I) “ANCILLARY MEMBER OF THE FRONTLINE TEAM” MEANS AN
INDIVIDUAL WHOSE PRIMARY DUTIES INCLUDE SUPPORTING INDIVIDUALS WHO
PROVIDE DIRECT PATIENT CARE.
(II) “ANCILLARY MEMBER OF THE FRONTLINE TEAM”
INCLUDES:
1. A DIETARY WORKER;
2. A PATIENT CARE TECHNICIAN; AND
3. ANY OTHER NONLICENSED STAFF ASSISTING WITH
PATIENT CARE.
(3) “CLINICAL STAFFING COMMITTEE” MEANS A COMMITTEE
ESTABLISHED BY A HOSPITAL IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS
SECTION.
(4) “CLINICAL STAFFING PLAN” MEANS A PLAN DEVELOPED UNDER
SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION.
(B) THIS PART DOES NOT APPLY TO STATE HOSPITALS.
(C) (1) EACH HOSPITAL LICENSED UNDER THIS TITLE SHALL ESTABLISH
AND MAINTAIN A CLINICAL STAFFING COMMITTEE THAT HAS EQUAL MEMBERSHIP
FROM MANAGEMENT AND EMPLOYEES.
(2) EACH CLINICAL STAFFING COMMITTEE ESTABLISHED UNDER
THIS PART SHALL INCLUDE AT LEAST ONE OF THE FOLLOWING INDIVIDUALS:
(I) A CERTIFIED NURSING ASSISTANT;
(II) A DIETARY AIDE;
(III) AN EMERGENCY ROOM NURSE;
(IV) AN ENVIRONMENTAL SERVICE WORKER;
(V) 1. A RESIDENT, IF THE COMMITTEE IS IN A TEACHING
HOSPITAL; OR
2. A PHYSICIAN, IF THE COMMITTEE IS IN A HOSPITAL
THAT IS NOT A TEACHING HOSPITAL; AND

SENATE BILL 720 3
(VI) A TECHNICIAN.
(3) A CLINICAL STAFFING COMMITTEE ESTABLISHED UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION MAY INCLUDE A PATIENT ADVOCATE.
(D) EACH CLINICAL STAFFING COMMITTEE SHALL DEVELOP A CLINICAL
STAFFING PLAN FOR THE HOSPITAL THAT ESTABLISHES THE APPROPRIATE NUMBER
OF CLINICIANS NEEDED TO ADMINISTER QUALITY HEALTH CARE BY SETTING.
(E) (1) WHEN DEVELOPING A CLINICAL STAFFING PLAN, THE CLINICAL
STAFFING COMMITTEE SHALL ESTABLISH, BASED ON THE PATIENT POPULATION OF
THE HOSPITAL:
(I) SUGGESTED GUIDELINES OR RATIOS, MATRICES, OR GRIDS
INDICATING HOW MANY PATIENTS SHOULD BE ASSIGNED TO EACH REGISTERED
NURSE BY UNIT OR SETTING; AND
(II) THE NUMBER OF REGISTERED NURSES, LICENSED
PRACTICAL NURSES, CERTIFIED NURSING ASSISTANTS, CERTIFIED MEDICINE
TECHNICIANS, ENVIRONMENTAL SERVICE WORKERS, AND ANCILLARY MEMBERS OF
THE DIRECT CARE TEAM THAT SHOULD BE PRESENT ON EACH UNIT DURING EACH
SHIFT.
(2) TO THE EXTENT PRACTICABLE, THE GUIDELINES ESTABLISHED
UNDER PARAGRAPH (1)(I) OF THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE BASED ON NATIONAL
EVIDENCE–BASED STANDARDS.
(F) ON OR BEFORE JULY 1 EACH YEAR, EACH HOSPITAL, THROUGH THE
CLINICAL STAFFING COMMITTEE, SHALL CONDUCT A REVIEW OF THE CLINICAL
STAFFING PLAN TO:
(1) EVALUATE THE EFFECTIVENESS OF THE CLINICAL STAFFING
PLAN DURING THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING YEAR;
(2) UPDATE THE CLINICAL STAFFING PLAN TO ENSURE THAT THE
CLINICAL STAFFING PLAN CONTINUES TO BE APPROPRIATE AND EFFECTIVE; AND
(3) DEVELOP A PROCESS FOR RECEIVING, RESOLVING, AND
TRACKING COMPLAINTS RELATED TO THE CLINICAL STAFFING PLAN.
(G) IN DEVELOPING THE CLINICAL STAFFING PLAN, THE CLINICAL
STAFFING COMMITTEE SHALL CONSIDER:

SENATE BILL 720
(1) THE AVERAGE NUMBER OF PATIENTS ON EACH UNIT ON EACH
SHIFT DURING THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING YEAR AND RELEVANT INFORMATION
REGARDING PATIENT DISCHARGES, POTENTIAL ADMISSIONS, AND TRANSFERS;
(2) THE AVERAGE LEVEL OF ACUITY FOR PATIENTS ON EACH UNIT ON
EACH SHIFT DURING THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING YEAR AND THE
CORRESPONDING LEVEL OF NURSING CARE REQUIRED; AND
(3) AN ESTIMATE OF THE APPROPRIATE COMBINATION OF SKILL,
EXPERIENCE LEVEL, AND SPECIALTY CERTIFICATION OR TRAINING OF STAFF FOR
EACH UNIT ON EACH SHIFT THAT IS REQUIRED TO ADEQUATELY PROVIDE CARE.
19–389.
(A) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1 EACH YEAR, BEGINNING IN 2026, EACH
HOSPITAL SHALL:
(1) IMPLEMENT THE CLINICAL STAFFING PLAN ADOPTED UNDER §
19–388 OF THIS SUBTITLE; AND
(2) ASSIGN PERSONNEL TO EACH PATIENT CARE UNIT IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THE CLINICAL STAFFING PLAN.
(B) A REGISTERED NURSE, A LICENSED PRACTICAL NURSE, AN ANCILLARY
MEMBER OF THE FRONTLINE TEAM, OR AN APPLICABLE EXCLUSIVE
REPRESENTATIVE MAY SUBMIT A COMPLAINT TO THE CLINICAL STAFFING
COMMITTEE REGARDING ANY VARIATION WHERE PERSONNEL ASSIGNMENT IN A
PATIENT CARE UNIT IS NOT IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE ADOPTED CLINICAL
STAFFING PLAN.
(C) THE CLINICAL STAFFING COMMITTEE SHALL DETERMINE, BY A
MAJORITY VOTE, WHETHER A COMPLAINT HAS BEEN ADEQUATELY RESOLVED.
19–390.
(A) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, ON OR BEFORE
JANUARY 1 EACH YEAR, EACH HOSPITAL SHALL:
(1) POST IN A PUBLICLY ACCESSIBLE AND CONSPICUOUS AREA ON
EACH PATIENT UNIT THE CLINICAL STAFFING PLAN FOR THE UNIT AND THE ACTUAL
DAILY STAFFING FOR EACH SHIFT ON THE UNIT;

SENATE BILL 720 5
(2) ENSURE THAT A COPY OF THE CLINICAL STAFFING PLAN IS
AVAILABLE, ON REQUEST, ON EACH PATIENT UNIT; AND
(3) POST THE CLINICAL STAFFING PLAN ON THE HOSPITAL’S
WEBSITE.
(B) IF A CLINICAL STAFFING PLAN FOR A UNIT IS AMENDED AFTER IT IS
IMPLEMENTED, THE HOSPITAL SHALL POST OR PROVIDE THE AMENDED CLINICAL
STAFFING PLAN FOR THE UNIT IN THE MANNER REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (A)
OF THIS SECTION, IN A TIMELY MANNER.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That each hospital shall establish
a clinical staffing committee as required under § 19–388 of the Health – General Article,
as enacted by Section 1 of this Act, on or before January 1, 2026.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That each clinical staffing
committee shall develop a clinical staffing plan as required under § 19–388 of the
Health – General Article, as enacted by Section 1 of this Act, on or before July 1, 2026.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.